District of Columbia statutes.
44-803

Liability for peer review actions or recommendations.

No peer review body or member thereof, or person acting as its staff, or who participates with or assists such a body or member, operating in the District of Columbia shall be liable to any person for damages or equitable relief by reason of conducting or taking peer review if the peer review was within the scope of the functions of the peer review body and if the peer review body or the member acted in the reasonable belief that the peer review was warranted by the facts known after reasonable effort to obtain the facts of the matter.

Sept. 29, 1978, D.C. Law 2-112, § 4, 25 DCR 1471
Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-234, § 2(c), 40 DCR 605
1981 Ed., § 32-503.
1973 Ed., § 32-363.